Mississippi, session 2026, SB2328.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1)  The Legislature finds that the release of balloons into the atmosphere poses a danger and nuisance to the environment, particularly to wildlife and marine animals. (2)  For the purpose of this section, the term "balloon" means a sac made from rubber, latex, polychloroprene, nylon, mylar, foil or any other material which is or can be filled with lighter-than-air gases.  The term "balloon" includes a floating sky lantern. (3)  It is unlawful to intentionally release a balloon outdoors, to organize the release of a balloon outdoors or to intentionally cause a balloon to be released outdoors, except under any of the following circumstances: (a)  A balloon is released on behalf of a governmental agency or pursuant to a governmental contract for scientific or meteorological purposes; (b)  A hot air balloon is recovered after launching; or (c)  A balloon is released and remains indoors. (4)  Any person who violates this section shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a misdemeanor and be fined an assessment of Twenty-Five Dollars ($25.00) per balloon released. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.